Hawaii, session 2025, SB1196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that over the past five years, the rideshare industry has experienced substantial growth nationally and in the State, transforming the way people commute and navigate.  This paradigm shift is evident in cities like Boston, where the sheer volume of rideshare rides reached a staggering $45,000,000 in 2022 alone.  As ridesharing continues to grow, its impact is felt more and more in Hawaii's communities and on its roads.  In Hawaii, a state heavily reliant on tourism, rideshare services are often utilized by visitors.  Visitors and rideshare platforms should contribute more to address the infrastructure and road safety issues they exacerbate and help alleviate the burden on local residents of improving and maintaining roads and infrastructure, especially around schools. The legislature further finds that implementing a fee has been successful for funding infrastructure in other states like Minnesota.  Hawaii has the potential to create a self-sustaining model where those benefiting the most from rideshare services contribute directly to the maintenance, enhancements and safety of the transportation infrastructure they utilize. This approach not only aligns with broader initiatives to promote responsible tourism, but also represents a responsible means of addressing the evolving challenges posed by the proliferation of rideshare services in the State. The purpose of this Act is to implement a fee on each rideshare ride to support the safe routes to school program. SECTION 2.  Chapter 279G, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§279G-    Rideshare fee.  (a)  There is levied and shall be assessed and collected a rideshare fee of $ on each ride originated through a rideshare application.  The rideshare fee shall be levied upon the rider. (b)  Each rideshare platform shall collect and remit the required rideshare fees to the department of taxation. (c)  All fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the safe routes to school program special fund established pursuant to section 291C-4." SECTION 3.  Section 291C-4, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§291C-4  Safe routes to school program special fund; establishment.  There is established in the state treasury the safe routes to school program special fund, into which shall be deposited: (1)  Assessments collected for speeding in a school zone, pursuant to section 291C-104; [and] (2)  Safe routes to school program surcharges collected in accordance with sections 291-16 and 291C-5[.]; and (3)  Ridesharing fees collected in accordance with section 279G-   ." SECTION 4.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________